Arkansas, session 2025, SB79.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 24, Chapter 2, Subchapter 7, is amended
to add additional sections to read as follows:
24-2-705. Service in Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System and
State Police Retirement System — Erroneous retirement — Affidavit.
*LJH054*
01/21/2025 9:18:13 AM LJH054

SB79
(a)(1) If a noncontributory member, including without limitation a
noncontributory member who is an elected official, establishes service in
both the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System and the State Police
Retirement System and has continuous service in either system, but
erroneously retired from both systems when his or her employment changed from
being covered by one (1) of the systems to the other system, the non-
contributory member may file with the relevant retirement system an affidavit
stating that his or her retirement from his or her most recent employer was
in error.
(2) If the noncontributory member files the affidavit in
subdivision (a)(1) of this section, he or she shall have his or her date of
retirement changed to the last date of employment with his or her most recent
employer.
(b) The Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System shall create a
formula to calculate interest that has accrued in the event that the
noncontributory member has:
(1) Paid contributions to the system that covers his or her most
recent employment; and
(2) Received any retirement benefits from the system that covers
his or her most recent employment.
(c) A person making an election under this section must submit the
affidavit under subdivision (a)(1) of this section no later than:
(1) Six (6) months after retiring from his or her final position
in covered employment with either the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement
System or the State Police Retirement System; or
(2) Six (6) months from the effective date of this act, if the
person has already retired from his or her final position in covered
employment with either the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System or
the State Police Retirement System.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 24-4-803(b), concerning a member's deferred
option contributions and selection of deferred retirement option, time of
retirement deferral, and retirement annuity under the Arkansas Public
Employees' Retirement System Deferred Retirement Option Plan, is amended to
read as follows:
(b)(1) The member's deferred option account shall be the account in
01/21/2025 9:18:13 AM LJH054

SB79
which shall be accumulated the member's deferred option contributions, plus
interest. Effective July 1, 1999, the The Arkansas Public Employees'
Retirement System's deferred option contributions shall be at least seventy-
five percent (75%) of the system's deferred option benefit with the exact
contribution to be determined in accordance with the rules of the board as is
actuarially appropriate for the system. The member shall be informed of the
amount of his or her deferred option contribution and informed that his or
her selection of the deferred retirement option, and the time of the
retirement deferral, and the selection of the retirement annuity are
irrevocable.
(2) The member's section of the retirement annuity may be
changed one (1) time after his or her initial election, subject to the
requirements of subdivision (b)(3) of this section:
(A) At the election of the member; and
(B) By contacting the board.
(3) A person making a change of election under subdivision
(b)(2) of this section must submit an affidavit requesting to change his or
her selection of retirement annuity no later than:
(A) Six (6) months after retiring from his or her final
position in covered employment with the system; or
(B) Six (6) months from the effective date of this act, if
the person has already retired from his or her final position in covered
employment with the system.
(4) A person who elects to change his or her selection of
retirement annuity under subdivision (b)(2) of this section shall pay to the
system a lump sum of any difference in the monetary benefits he or she
received from his or her initial selection of retirement annuity and his or
her subsequent selection of retirement annuity to the system within six (6)
months after the change in retirement annuity becomes effective.







01/21/2025 9:18:13 AM LJH054